Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1701
County road purposes; property acquisition; eminent domain; power of county board.

When in the judgment of the county board it is necessary or proper for the safety or convenience of the traveling public that additional property be secured for establishment of new roads or for improvement or maintenance of existing roads within the county, such board may on behalf of the county, take, hold and appropriate such property by the exercise of the power of eminent domain, the procedure therefor to be exercised in the manner set forth in Chapter 76, article 7. All costs, expenses, and damages incurred shall be paid out of the general fund of the county or the county road fund.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 1, p. 540;

Laws 1973, LB 493, § 1.